Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3508
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Civil Remedies for Unauthorized Disclosure of Intimate Images Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Laws 2019, LB680, § 8.